Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13001 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Legislature hereby designates the Muslim Brotherhood and its


successor organization, the Council on American-Islamic Relations


(CAIR), as domestic terrorist organizations. All relevant state


departments and agencies shall utilize all applicable authorities to


investigate, disrupt, and dismantle any and all illegal operations,


especially those involving terrorist actions, conducted by the


Muslim Brotherhood, CAIR, or any person claiming to act on behalf of


the Muslim Brotherhood or CAIR, or for which the Muslim Brotherhood,


CAIR, or any person claiming to act on behalf of the Muslim

Req. No. 3553 Page 1


Brotherhood or CAIR provided material support, including necessary


investigatory and prosecutorial actions against those who fund such


operations.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3553 BLB 1/9/2026 8:41:36 AM































Req. No. 3553 Page 2